New Jersey, session 221, A1111.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, commercial motor vehicle means a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles used or designed to transport passengers or property that has a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 or more pounds or displays a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 or more pounds. Commercial motor vehicle shall not include a motor vehicle that is operated by, or under contract with, a public or governmental agency, or religious or other charitable organization or corporation, or is privately operated, and is used for the transportation of children to or from a school, school connected activity, day camp, summer day camp, summer residence camp, nursery school, child care center, preschool center or other similar places of education. b.  A commercial motor vehicle operating upon the public highways of this State shall be equipped with a global positioning system navigation program that shall provide: (1)   information about upcoming highway infrastructure with low vertical clearance and weight restrictions; and (2)   dynamic route directions that account for commercial motor vehicle restrictions based upon the specific height and weight of the commercial motor vehicle when entered by the driver. 2.    The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately but shall remain inoperative until 180 days after the date of enactment.